Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-140
Orders; enforcement; petition; notice.

Whenever any person violates or disobeys an order issued by the commission which has been finally established, the commission or any person interested in such order may petition to the district court of Lancaster County alleging violation or disobedience thereof. The court may determine the matter on such notice to the person complained of as the court deems reasonable. The notice may be served on such person as the court directs.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. I, § 40, p. 1369;

Laws 1989, LB 78, § 12;

Laws 1993, LB 42, § 12;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 53.